Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB474.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (n.1) To maintain a publicly accessible Internet website for information relating to the county board, which Internet website's domain name includes the sponsored top-level domain ".gov."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0474PN0457 - 2 - 123456